Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2512
Effect of adjudication for or against personal representative.

An adjudication rendered in any jurisdiction, which has an applicable provision of law similar in reciprocal effect to this provision, in favor of or against any personal representative of the estate is as binding on the local personal representative as if he were a party to the adjudication.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 218, UPC § 4-401.